Utah statutes.
11-39-102.   Requirement for plans and specifications and cost estimate.

Each local entity intending to undertake a building improvement or public works project paid for by the local entity shall cause:

(1)  plans and specifications to be made for the building improvement or public works project; and

(2)  an estimate of the cost of the building improvement or public works project to be made.

